California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(c) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), until regulations are filed with the Secretary of State, the State Department of Social Services shall, in consultation with the State Department of Education, on or before December 31, 2023, implement this section through all-county letter or similar instructions until regulations are adopted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 915, Sec. 6.   (AB 2806)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10281.2.

Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 8243 of the Education Code or paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 10281 of this code, alternative payment programs and agencies administering CalWORKs Stage 1, Stage 2, or Stage 3 programs, serving children zero to five years of age, inclusive, may utilize funds for administrative and support services to provide early childhood mental health consultation services, if the service meets the requirements of Section 10281.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 915, Sec. 7.   (AB 2806)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10281.5.

(a) In order to reflect the additional expense of serving children who meet any of the criteria outlined in subdivision (c), the provider agency’s reported child days of enrollment for these children shall be multiplied by the adjustment factors listed below.

(b) The adjustment factors described in subdivision (c) shall apply to those programs for which assigned reimbursement rates are at or below the standard reimbursement rate. In addition, the adjustment factors shall apply to those programs for which assigned reimbursement rates are above the standard reimbursement rate, but the reimbursement rate, as adjusted, shall not exceed the adjusted standard reimbursement rate.

(c) Notwithstanding any
 other law, commencing January 1, 2019, the adjustment factors shall be as follows:

(1) Prior to January 1, 2022, for infants who are 0 to 18 months of age, inclusive, and are served in a child care center or a family child care home, the adjustment factor shall be 2.44.

(2) Prior to January 1, 2022, for toddlers who are 18 to 36 months of age, inclusive, and are served in a child care center or a family child care home, the adjustment factor shall be 1.8.

(3) For children with exceptional needs who are 0 to 21 years of age, inclusive, the adjustment factor shall be 1.54.

(4) For severely disabled children who are 0 to 21 years of age, inclusive, the adjustment factor shall be 1.93.

(5) Prior to January 1, 2022, for children at risk of neglect, abuse, or exploitation who are 0 to 14 years of age the adjustment factor shall be 1.1.

(6) Prior to January 1, 2022, for dual language learner children who are two years of age through kindergarten age, inclusive, the adjustment factor shall be 1.1.

(7) For infants and toddlers who are 0 to 36 months of age, inclusive, and are served in general child care and development programs, or children who are 0 to 5 years of age, inclusive, and are served in a family child care home education network setting funded by a general child care and development program, where early childhood mental health consultation services are provided, pursuant to Section 10281, the adjustment factor shall be 1.1.

(d) Use of the adjustment factors shall not increase the provider agency’s total annual allocation.

(e) (1) Days of enrollment for children who meet more than one of the criteria outlined in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (c) shall not be reported under more than one of the categories specified in those paragraphs.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), for children for whom an adjustment factor is applied pursuant to any of paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (c), and who are additionally eligible for the adjustment factor established in paragraph (7) of subdivision (c), reported child days of
 enrollment shall be multiplied by the sum of the applicable adjustment factor under paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (c) and 0.05.

(f) The difference between the reimbursement resulting from the use of the adjustment factors outlined in subdivision (c) and the reimbursement that would otherwise be received by a provider in the absence of the adjustment factors shall be used for special and appropriate services for each child for whom an adjustment factor is claimed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 571, Sec. 48.   (AB 185)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10282.5.

(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 10280, the assigned reimbursement rate of a center-based child care agency (a) contracting with the department, (b) operating under licensing standards for child care and development facilities specified by Section 1500 et seq. of the Health and Safety Code and by Title 22 of the California Administrative Code, and (c) with less than a majority of subsidized children enrolled in the facility, shall be equivalent to the fee paid for the same service by families of nonsubsidized children.

(b) It is not the intent of the Legislature to preclude an agency with a contract with the department from adjusting the fees charged to nonsubsidized children during the contract year. In no event shall the
 assigned reimbursement rate exceed the standard reimbursement rate established pursuant to Section 10280.

(c) These agencies shall provide documentation to the department that subsidized children, as necessary and appropriate, shall receive supportive services through county welfare departments, resource and referral programs, or other existing community resources, or all of them.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10283.

(a) Commencing with the 1995–96 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, for purposes of this part, reimbursement rates shall be adjusted by the following reimbursement factors for child care and development programs with a standard reimbursement rate, but shall not apply to the resource and referral programs set forth in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10217), the alternative payment programs set forth in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10225), or the schoolage parent and infant development programs:

(1) Prior to January 1, 2022, for child care and development providers serving children for less than four hours per day, the reimbursement factor is 55 percent of the standard reimbursement rate.

(2) Prior to January 1, 2022, for child care and development program providers serving children for not less than four hours per day, and less than six and one-half hours per day, the reimbursement factor is 75 percent of the standard reimbursement rate. For providers operating under Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 10370) and serving children for not less than four hours per day, and less than seven hours per day, the reimbursement factor is 75 percent of the standard reimbursement rate.

(3) Prior to January 1, 2022, for child care and development program providers serving children for not less than six and one-half hours per day, and less than 10 and one-half hours per day, the reimbursement factor is 100 percent of the standard reimbursement rate. For child care and development providers operating under Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 10370) and serving children for not
 less than seven hours per day, and less than 10 hours per day, the reimbursement factor is 100 percent of the standard reimbursement rate.

(4) For child care and development program providers serving children for 10 and one-half hours or more per day, the reimbursement factor is 118 percent of the standard reimbursement rate.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature, notwithstanding the difference between the standard reimbursement rate and the regional market rate, to support serving children for the length of day that is appropriate under a provider’s contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10284.

(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 10280, the payment made to a child care facility (a) with authorization for payments from an alternative payment program or a county welfare department, (b) operating under licensing standards for child day care facilities specified by Sections 1500 et seq. of the Health and Safety Code and by Title 22 of the California Administrative Code, and (c) with less than a majority of subsidized children enrolled in the facility, shall be the same as the fee paid for the same service by families of nonsubsidized children.

(b) Each alternative payment system or county welfare department shall provide documentation that subsidized children, as necessary and appropriate, shall receive supportive services
 through county welfare departments, resource and referral programs, other existing community resources, or all of them.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10284.5.

The audits for those agencies licensed under the provisions of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code shall include a sampling of the evidence of fees paid by families of nonsubsidized children, the average daily enrollment of subsidized and nonsubsidized children, the average number of days of service provided to subsidized children, and the services provided to subsidized children pursuant to the terms of the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10284.6.

The department and the State Controller shall establish the necessary plans to advance child care funds to contracting agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10285.

The department shall adopt rules, regulations, and guidelines to facilitate the funding and reimbursement procedures required by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10286.

The department shall support the coordination of resources available to state and local agencies serving children, youth, and their families.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10286.5.

In the event that operating agencies are unable to operate due to incomplete renovations authorized by administrating state agencies, or due to circumstances beyond the control of the operating agency, including earthquakes, floods, or fire, such programs shall not be penalized for incurred program expenses nor in subsequent annual budget allocations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10287.

(a) The rules, regulations, and guidelines adopted by the department pursuant to Sections 10267.5 and 10285 shall permit reimbursement for interest paid by contractors on private sector debt financing for the purchase, lease-purchase, repair, or renovation of child care and development facilities owned or leased by contractors providing center-based care.

(b) The department shall adopt regulations requiring contractors to demonstrate that the amount of interest paid in a year on private sector debt financing for the purposes identified in subdivision (a) does not exceed the value obtained by the state in the use of the facilities during the year for the child care and development services program. The regulations shall include, but not be
 limited to, the following methods of making this demonstration:

(1) Amortization of a loan or lease-purchase contract on a straight-line basis for the purchase price of a portable building, including any transportation charges, installation charges, loan fees, taxes, points or other fees associated with the purchase, over a period of 15 years or more.

(2) Amortization of a loan or lease-purchase contract on a straight-line basis for the purchase price of a permanent building and real estate, including any loan fees, taxes, points or other fees associated with the purchase, over a period of 15 years or more.

(3) Evidence acceptable to the department that loan payments for the purchase of a portable building or permanent building and real estate, including principal and interest, do not exceed the fair market rental
 cost that the contractor would have paid if the property was not purchased.

(c) Loans or lease-purchase agreements amortized over the number of years designated in subdivision (b), but due in a fewer number of years, shall not be disallowed because of the shorter due date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10287.5.

A center-based child care agency contracting with the department to provide center-based child care services may schedule up to two days of staff training, per contract period, using state reimbursement funding on the topics including procedures for emergencies in child development programs, licensing regulations relating to child development programs, recognition and reporting of suspected abuse of children in child development programs, managing challenging behaviors and preventing expulsion of children, and addressing items on the program’s Quality Rating and Improvement System (QRIS) Quality plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. Family Fees [10290. - 10292.]

10290.

(a) The department, in consultation with the State Department of Education, shall establish a fee schedule for families using preschool and childcare and development services pursuant to this part including families receiving services pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 10271. It is the intent of the Legislature that the new fee schedule shall be simple and easy to implement.

(b) The family fee schedule shall retain a single flat monthly fee per family. The schedule shall differentiate between fees for part-time care and full-time care.

(c) Using the most recently approved family fee schedule pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 10436, families shall be assessed a single flat
 monthly fee for all state-subsidized services, including California state preschool program services administered by the State Department of Education, based on income, certified family need for full-time or part-time care services, and enrollment, and shall not be based on actual attendance. No recalculation of a family fee shall occur if attendance varies from enrollment unless a change in need for care is assessed, as requested by the parent.

(d) Family fees shall not be based on the cost of care or amount of subsidy payment.

(e) (1) The department shall design the new family fee schedule based on the most recent census data available on state median family income in the past 12 months, adjusted for family size, according to the methodology provided in subdivision (c) of Section 10271.5. The department shall first submit the adjusted fee schedule to the
 Department of Finance for approval.

(2) Commencing October 1, 2023, both of the following apply:

(A) The revised fees described in paragraph (1) shall not exceed 1 percent of the family’s monthly income.

(B) A family with an adjusted monthly family income below 75 percent of the state median family income shall not be charged or assessed a family fee.

(f) The income of a recipient of federal supplemental security income benefits pursuant to Title XVI of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1381 et seq.) and state supplemental program benefits pursuant to Title XVI of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1381 et seq.) and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) of Part 3 shall not be included in total countable income for purposes
 of determining the amount of the family fee.

(g) Family fees shall be assessed at initial enrollment and reassessed at update of certification or recertification.

(h) The implementation of this section shall comply with the requirements specified in subdivision (h) of Section 10271.

(i) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, family fees shall not be collected for the 2021–22 fiscal year pursuant to Section 263 of Chapter 116 of the Statutes of 2021.

(j) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, family fees shall not be collected for the 2022–23 fiscal year.

(k) During the 2022–23 fiscal year, contractors shall reimburse subsidized childcare providers for the full
 amount of the certificate or voucher without deducting family fees.

(l) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, family fees shall not be collected between July 1, 2023, and September 30, 2023, inclusive.

(2) Between July 1, 2023, and September 30, 2023, inclusive, contractors shall reimburse subsidized childcare providers for the full amount of the certificate or voucher without deducting family fees.

(3) Notwithstanding any other law, federal funds that were previously appropriated in Sections 263 and 265 of Chapter 116 of the Statutes of 2021 to expand childcare access slots and provide for family fee waivers and the reimbursement for waived family fees shall be available in the 2023–24 fiscal year in an amount that is equal to the cost to extend family fee waivers
 between July 1, 2023, and September 30, 2023, inclusive, for all families receiving subsidized childcare services from childcare providers through programs administered by the State Department of Social Services pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10225), Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 10235), Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 10240), Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 10250), Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 10260), Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 10370), and Section 11461.6.

(m) (1) No later than January 1, 2027, contractors shall reimburse subsidized childcare providers for the full amount of the certificate or voucher without deducting family fees and shall collect family fees pursuant to this section.

(2) The department shall work with any contractor in need of technical assistance in order to come into compliance with this subdivision.

(n) Family fees accrued but uncollected prior to October 1, 2023, may be forgiven and not collected.

(o) (1) A childcare provider paid with childcare subsidies, including, but not limited to, a family childcare home provider participating in a family childcare home education network, shall not absorb a reduction in pay for the contracted childcare space or voucher on account of a waiver of or reduction in family fees.

(2) The number of childcare contracted spaces and vouchers shall not be reduced on account of a reduction in the collection of family fees.

(3) Fifty-six million dollars ($56,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the
 State Department of Social Services in fiscal year 2023–24 to reimburse childcare providers described in paragraph (1) for family fees waived or reduced pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (e).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 25, Sec. 32.   (AB 150)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10291.

(a) A family that receives services pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 10271 may be exempt from family fees for up to 24 months.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a family receiving CalWORKs cash aid shall not be charged a family fee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 234, Sec. 3.   (SB 792)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10292.

(a) The family fee schedule shall provide, among other things, that a contractor or provider may require parents to provide diapers. A contractor or provider offering field trips either may include the cost of the field trips within the service rate charged to the parent or may charge parents an additional fee. Federal or state money shall not be used to reimburse parents for the costs of field trips if those costs are charged as an additional fee. A contractor or provider that charges parents an additional fee for field trips shall inform parents, before enrolling the child, that a fee may be charged and that no reimbursement will be available.

(b) A contractor or provider may require parents to provide diapers or charge parents for
 field trips, subject to all of the following conditions:

(1) The contractor or provider has a written policy adopted by the agency’s governing board that includes parents in the decisionmaking process regarding both of the following:

(A) Whether or not, and how much, to charge for field trip expenses.

(B) Whether or not to require parents to provide diapers.

(2) The contractor or provider does not charge fees in excess of twenty-five dollars ($25) per child in a contract year.

(3) The contractor or provider does not deny participation in a field trip due to a parent’s inability or refusal to pay the fee.

(4) The contractor or
 provider does not take adverse action against a parent for the parent’s inability or refusal to pay the fee.

(c) A contractor or provider shall establish a payment system that prevents the identification of children based on whether or not a child’s family has paid field trip fees.

(d) The contractor or provider shall report expenses incurred and income received for field trips to the department. Income received shall be reported as restricted income.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 13. Allocations and Expenditures [10300. - 10309.8.]

10300.

(a) The department may reimburse approvable startup costs of child development agencies or facilities in an amount not to exceed 15 percent of the expansion or increase of each agency’s total contract amount. Under no circumstances shall reimbursement for startup costs result in an increase in the agency’s total contract amount. These funds shall be available for all of the following:

(1) The employment and orientation of necessary staff.

(2) The setting up of the program and facility.

(3) The finalization of rental agreements and the making of necessary deposits.

(4) The purchase of a reasonable inventory of materials and supplies.

(5) The purchase of an initial premium for insurance.

(b) Agencies shall submit claims for startup costs with their first quarterly reports.

(c) The Legislature recognizes that allowances for startup costs are necessary for the establishment and stability of new child development programs. Programs initially funded in the 1978–79 fiscal year and 1979–80 fiscal year are included in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10300.5.

(a) The department and the State Department of Education shall promote full utilization of childcare and development and preschool funds and match available unused funds with identified service needs. The department and the State Department of Education shall attempt to arrange intra-agency adjustments between California state preschool program contracts and general childcare contracts for the same agency and funding allocation. The department and the State Department of Education shall establish timelines for intra-agency contract fund transfers.

(b) The department shall promote full utilization of childcare and development program funds and match available unused funds with identified service needs. Notwithstanding the requirements of Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, the department shall arrange interagency adjustments between different contractors with the same type of contract when both agencies mutually agree to a temporary transfer of funds for the balance of the fiscal year. The department shall
 establish timelines for interagency contract fund transfers. 

(c) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department and the State Department of Education may implement and administer this section through the issuance of guidance or other written directives, which may include, but is not limited to, establishing timelines for submittal of requests to transfer funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 41, Sec. 17.   (AB 116)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10301.

(a) The department shall develop a plan and procedures for the allocation of expansion funding balances resulting from the pro rata allocation of expansion for the partial year operations of new agencies.

(b) A plan shall provide for the distribution of such funds among provider agencies whose enrollments include children with special needs and shall limit provider agencies’ use of these funds to the purchase of department-approved equipment or materials or one-time-only services, or any of them, that will directly benefit the children with special needs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10301.5.

(a) The Legislature recognizes the shortage of child care and development and preschool facilities which meet state and local health and safety standards, and the lack of other sources of funding for renovations and repairs necessary to upgrade facilities for licensing in order to accommodate major child care and preschool expansion. It is, therefore, the intent of the Legislature that funds be appropriated for the purpose of providing revolving loans with no interest, as provided in Section 10303, to all other types of child care and development and preschool facilities, in order to provide sufficient child care and development and preschool facilities meeting licensing standards to accommodate the level of child care and preschool expansion provided in this chapter.

(b) It is further the intent of the Legislature that funds be appropriated for the state purchase of relocatable child care and development and preschool facilities as provided in Section 10307, for lease to qualifying contracting agencies in geographic areas with no available child care and development or preschool facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10302.

Unless specifically exempted by the Legislature, the administrative cost for all state-funded child care and development and preschool programs and all federal programs administered by the state shall not exceed 15 percent of the funds provided for those programs. Eighty-five percent of these funds shall be used to provide direct services in accordance with rules and regulations, or contractual funding terms and conditions prescribed by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10302.5.

(a) The department shall establish regulations for the allocation of capital outlay funds provided pursuant to Section 10303 to Section 10304.5, inclusive, to benefit children most needing child care and development or preschool programs. The first priority for all capital outlay shall be given to facilities located in geographic areas with no other available enrollment slots in existing subsidized and nonsubsidized child care and development or preschool facilities. All such capital outlay funding shall be used solely for purposes of renovation and repair of existing buildings.

(b) The department shall establish qualifications for determining the eligibility of contracting agencies and day care homes to apply for capital outlay
 funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10303.

The department shall establish a revolving loan fund to provide loans to child care and development or preschool contracting agencies for capital outlay not to exceed 2 percent or two thousand dollars ($2,000), whichever is greater, of the agency’s contract amount. These loans shall be available with no interest and shall be used to renovate and repair child care or preschool facilities to meet state and local health and safety standards.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10304.

(a) Repayments on loans made pursuant to Section 10303 shall commence within one year after allocation of the loan to the contracting agency. In lieu of payments by the contracting agency, the department shall annually reduce the agency’s contract amount for child care or preschool services by at least the level of normal depreciation allowance on the renovation or repair, calculated by the straight line method of depreciation.

(b) The entire balance of a loan made pursuant to this section shall be payable to the department immediately if the contracting agency ceases operation of services to children subsidized pursuant to this chapter, or if the department fails to renew the agency’s contract, or if 10 years have elapsed from the date
 of the allocation.

(c) The department shall deposit all revenue derived from loan payments made by contracting agencies, or reductions made by the department in agencies’ contracts in lieu of payments, into the revolving loan fund for allocation to other contracting agencies for capital outlay projects pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10304.5.

The state shall hold a security interest in all renovations and repairs funded pursuant to Section 10303.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10305.

(a) For purposes of this section “department” means the Department of Housing and Community Development.

(b) Subject to appropriation in the annual Budget Act, the Child Care and Development Facilities Loan Guaranty Fund and the Child Care and Development Facilities Direct Loan Fund are hereby established in the State Treasury. The State Department of Social Services may transfer state funds appropriated for child care and preschool facilities enhancement and the proceeds derived from any future sales of tax-exempt child care and development and preschool facilities bonds into these funds.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys in the Child Care
 and Development Facilities Loan Guaranty Fund and the Child Care and Development Facilities Direct Loan Fund, including any interest on loans made from the fund, or loan repayments to the fund, are hereby continuously appropriated to the department for carrying out the purposes of this section and Section 10305.5, respectively. Any loan repayment or interest resulting from investment or deposit of moneys in these funds shall be deposited in the applicable fund, notwithstanding Section 16305.7 of the Government Code. Moneys in the funds shall not be subject to transfer to any other fund pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 16300) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, except the Surplus Money Investment Fund.

(d) (1) Moneys deposited in the Child Care and Development Facilities Loan Guaranty Fund shall be used for the purpose of guaranteeing private sector loans to sole proprietorships, partnerships,
 proprietary and nonprofit corporations, and local public agencies for the purchase, development, construction, expansion, or improvement of licensed child care and development and preschool facilities, and for the purpose of administering the guarantees of these loans. The loan guarantees shall be made by the department or by a public or private entity approved by the department, in accordance with the priorities established by the department, as described in Section 10305.5. The full faith and credit of the State of California is not pledged to the Child Care and Development Facilities Loan Guaranty Fund and the state is not liable for loan defaults that exceed the amount of funds deposited with the Child Care and Development Facilities Loan Guaranty Fund.

(2) A loan guarantee made pursuant to this section may not exceed 80 percent of the principal and interest amount of a private sector loan guaranteed by the fund and shall be used only to
 guarantee a private sector loan for the purchase, development, construction, expansion, or improvement of facilities described in Section 10305.5 and for related equipment and fixtures, but shall not be used primarily to refinance an existing loan or for working capital, supplies, or inventory. A loan guarantee for improvements shall be limited to those improvements necessary, as determined by the department, for any of the following purposes:

(A) To obtain, maintain, renew, expand, or revise a child care license.

(B) To make necessary health and safety improvements.

(C) To make seismic improvements.

(D) To provide access for disabled children.

(E) To expand upon or preserve existing child
 care and preschool operations.

(3) The aggregate amount of outstanding loan guarantees shall not exceed four times the amount in the Child Care and Development Facilities Loan Guaranty Fund.

(4) A loan guarantee made pursuant to this section shall be for the term of the loan or 20 years, whichever is less. Security for the guaranteed loan may include a deed of trust, personal guarantees of shareholders and partners in the case of proprietary borrowers, or other reasonably available collateral. These liens may be subordinated to other liens. Default provisions and other terms shall be reasonable and designed to obtain prompt and full repayment of the guaranteed loan by the borrower. Reasonable loan guarantee fees and points may be charged to applicants and borrowers by any public or private entity approved by the department, as described in regulations adopted by the
 department.

(5) A loan guarantee made pursuant to this section shall only be granted if the applicant agrees to provide child care or preschool in a facility for a period of 20 years or the term of the guaranteed loan, whichever is less.

(6) A loan guarantee made pursuant to this section terminates 120 days after the lender’s receipt of notice that the recipient has either ceased making payments or providing child care or preschool in the facility for which the loan was made, or both, unless the lender takes action to accelerate the loan. If a family child care provider ceases to operate, but retains its three-year license, the provider shall give notice to the department and the lending institution of its intention to resume offering child care services or preschool services for the term of its license, or shall provide notice of its intention to cease providing child care or
 preschool services. The Child Care and Development Facilities Loan Guaranty Fund is not liable for a default occurring after the loan guarantee has ended.

(e) (1) Moneys deposited in the Child Care and Development Facilities Direct Loan Fund shall be used for the purpose of making subordinated loans directly or through a public or private entity approved by the department to sole proprietorships, partnerships, proprietary and nonprofit corporations, and local public agencies for the purchase, development, construction, expansion, or improvement of licensed child care and development or preschool facilities, and for the purpose of administering these loans. Loans shall be made in accordance with the priorities established by the department as set forth in Section 10305.5. The full faith and credit of the State of California is not pledged to the Child Care and Development Facilities Direct Loan Fund and the state is not
 liable for loan defaults that exceed the amount of funds deposited in the Child Care and Development Facilities Direct Loan Fund.

(2) A loan made pursuant to this section may not exceed 75 percent of the total amount of investment for the purchase, development, expansion, or improvement of eligible child care and development or preschool facilities as described in Section 10305.5 and for related equipment and fixtures, but may not be used primarily to refinance an existing loan, for working capital, for supplies, or for inventory. A loan made pursuant to this section may not exceed 20 percent of the total amount of investment if the same facility is also utilizing a loan guarantee pursuant to subdivision (c). Investment for purposes of this paragraph means the total cost paid or incurred by the applicant in constructing, renovating, or acquiring a facility. A loan for improvements shall be limited to those improvements necessary, as determined
 by the department, for any of the following purposes:

(A) To obtain, maintain, renew, expand, or revise a child care license.

(B) To make necessary health and safety improvements.

(C) To make seismic improvements.

(D) To provide access for disabled children.

(E) To expand upon or preserve existing child care or preschool operations.

(3) The term of a loan made pursuant to this section may not exceed 30 years. Security for the loan may include a deed of trust, personal guarantees of shareholders and partners in the case of proprietary borrowers, or other reasonably available collateral. These liens may be subordinated to other
 liens. The payment provisions, late charges, and other terms may vary based on the ability of the borrower to repay the loan, but shall be reasonable and designed to obtain prompt and full repayment of the loan by the borrower. A direct loan shall bear simple interest at the rate of 3 percent per annum on the unpaid principal balance. Reasonable loan fees and points may be charged to applicants and borrowers, as described in regulations adopted by the department. The department may permit a loan to be assumed by an otherwise qualified borrower who agrees to continue to provide child care or preschool for the balance of the original term of the loan.

(f) Funds appropriated for the purposes of this section and Section 10305.5 shall be made from funds that are not designated as meeting the state’s minimum funding obligation under Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10305.5.

(a) For purposes of this section “department” means the Department of Housing and Community Development.
